Missouri, session 2026, SJR65.
Be it enacted by
the people of the state of Missouri:".
Section 50(a). Each initiative petition that has been
approved, pursuant to the process established by law, to be
circulated for signature gathering shall have a summary
statement of the measure prepared in the manner established
by law. The summary statement shall not exceed one hundred
words and shall be a complete, concise, clear, and accurate
statement of the measure. If a court of competent
jurisdiction finds that a summary statement is not a
complete, concise, clear, and accurate statement of the
measure and that a complete, concise, clear, and accurate
statement cannot possibly be written in one hundred or less
words, the court shall prohibit the measure from being
circulated for further signatures or, in the event that the
measure has been certified to be placed on the ballot, the
court shall order the measure to be removed from the ballot.
✓